Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB642.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 161.520 is amended to read as follows:
Upon the death of an active contributing member or upon the death of a member retired for disability, except as
provided in KRS 161.661(6), the survivors of the deceased member in the following named order, may elect to
receive a survivor's benefit payable as follows:
(1) Where there is a surviving widow or widower who is named as the primary beneficiary of the member's
retirement account, the benefit shall be:
(a) One hundred eighty dollars ($180) per month with no restriction on other income;
(b) Two hundred forty dollars ($240) per month when the surviving widow or widower's total income from
all sources does not exceed six thousand six hundred dollars ($6,600) per year or five hundred fifty
dollars ($550) per month; or
(c) If the deceased member has a minimum of ten (10) years of service credit with the Teachers' Retirement
System, the surviving widow or widower may apply for an annuity actuarially equivalent to the annuity
that would have been paid to the deceased member when eligibility conditions were met. Eligibility for
payments would begin at the time the age of the deceased member would have met the requirements of
KRS 161.600(1) or (2), as applicable. In exercising this right, the surviving widow or widower shall be
entitled to receive an annuity for life. This subsection applies to surviving spouses of members who die
on or after July 1, 1978. A surviving widow or widower of a member who dies after July 1, 1978, shall
be eligible for benefit payments provided under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection until they
begin receiving payments under this provision;
(2) (a) Where there are surviving unmarried children under age eighteen (18) or under age nineteen (19) if a
full-time student in high school, the benefit shall be two hundred dollars ($200) per month in the case of
one (1) child, three hundred forty dollars ($340) per month in the case of two (2) children, four hundred
dollars ($400) per month in the case of three (3) children, and four hundred forty dollars ($440) per
month in the case of four (4) or more children. Benefits under this subsection shall apply in addition to
benefits which may be payable under subsections (1) and (3) of this section.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the surviving spouse may elect to receive a lump-
sum refund of the member's accumulated account balance in lieu of the survivorship benefits payable
under this subsection and subsection (1) of this section only if the surviving spouse is designated as the
primary beneficiary and:
1. Is a biological or adoptive parent of all children eligible for a benefit under this subsection and
has not had his or her parental rights terminated; or
2. Has been appointed as legal guardian of all of the children eligible under paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(c) To elect a lump-sum refund of the member's accumulated account balance under paragraph (b) of this
subsection, the surviving spouse who is designated as the primary beneficiary must sign a waiver on
forms prescribed by the retirement system of his or her rights and the member's children's rights to the
survivorship benefits payable under this subsection and subsection (1) of this section. The surviving
spouse shall not waive the survivorship benefits available under this subsection or subsections (1) and
(6) of this section if any of the member's children have attained age eighteen (18) or older unless all of
those children consent in writing on forms prescribed by the retirement system to waive their
survivorship benefits available under this subsection;
(3) (a) Where the survivor is a child age eighteen (18) or older whose mental or physical condition is sufficient
to cause his or her dependency on the deceased member at the time of the member's death, the benefit
shall be two hundred dollars ($200) per month, payable for the life of the child or until the time as the
mental or physical condition creating the dependency no longer exists or the child marries. The mental
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
or physical condition of the adult child shall be revealed by a competent examination by a licensed
physician[ and shall be approved by a majority of a medical review committee as defined in KRS
161.661(14)]. Benefits under this subsection shall apply in addition to benefits which may be payable
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the surviving spouse shall not elect to receive a
lump-sum refund of the member's accumulated account balance in lieu of the survivorship benefits
payable under this subsection and subsection (1) of this section unless:
1. The surviving spouse is designated as the primary beneficiary;
2. The surviving spouse has been appointed by the court as guardian, conservator, or other fiduciary
with sufficient general or specific authority to waive the survivorship benefits available under
this subsection for any child or children age eighteen (18) or older who have been adjudicated
incompetent to make decisions on their own behalf by a court of law; and
3. Any child or children age eighteen (18) or older who are mentally competent to make decisions
on their own behalf consent in writing on forms prescribed by the retirement system to waive
their survivorship benefits available under this subsection.
(c) If eligible to elect a lump-sum refund of the member's accumulated account balance, the surviving
spouse shall sign a waiver on forms prescribed by the retirement system of his or her rights and the
member's children's rights to the survivorship benefits payable under this subsection and subsections (1)
and (2) of this section;
(4) Where the sole eligible survivors are dependent parents aged sixty-five (65) or over, the benefit shall be two
hundred dollars ($200) per month for one (1) parent or two hundred ninety dollars ($290) per month for two
(2) parents. Dependency of a parent shall be established as of the date of the death of the member;
(5) Where the sole eligible survivor is a dependent brother or sister, the benefit shall be one hundred sixty five
dollars ($165) per month. In order to qualify, the brother or sister must have been a resident of the deceased
member's household for at least one (1) full year prior to the member's death or must have been receiving care
in a hospital, nursing home, or other institution at the member's expense for same period;
(6) The benefit to a child as defined in subsection (2) of this section shall terminate upon the attainment of age
eighteen (18) or upon reaching age nineteen (19), if a full-time student in high school, or upon marriage,
except that benefits shall continue until the attainment of age twenty-three (23) for an unmarried child who is a
full-time student in a recognized educational program beyond the high school level. The benefit to a dependent
parent or dependent brother or sister or dependent child age eighteen (18) or older shall terminate upon
marriage, or upon termination of the condition creating the dependency;
(7) The board of trustees shall be the sole judge of eligibility or dependency of any beneficiary, and may require
formal application or information relating to eligibility or dependency, including proof of annual income
satisfactory to the board. The board of trustees may subpoena records and individuals whenever it deems this
action necessary;
(8) No payment of benefits shall be made unless the board of trustees authorizes the payment. The board shall
promulgate administrative regulations for the administration of the provisions in this section and in every case
the decision of the board of trustees shall be final as to eligibility, dependency, or disability, and the amount of
benefits payable;
(9) In the event that there are no eligible survivors as defined in subsections (1) to (5) of this section, or in the
event that the surviving spouse elects not to receive survivorship benefits on his or her own behalf or on behalf
of any of the member's children as permitted under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the board of trustees
shall pay to the estate or the designated beneficiaries of the deceased member a refund of his or her
accumulated account balance as provided in KRS 161.470(7). If the benefits paid or payable under subsections
(1) to (5) of this section and KRS 161.661 shall amount to a sum less than the member's accumulated account
balance at the time of death, the board of trustees shall pay to the estate or designated beneficiaries of the
deceased member the balance of the accumulated account balance;
(10) Any person who is receiving benefits and becomes disqualified from receiving those benefits under this
section shall immediately notify the Teachers' Retirement System of this disqualification in writing and shall
return all benefits paid after the date of disqualification. Failure to comply with these provisions shall create an
indebtedness of that person to the Teachers' Retirement System. Interest at the rate of eight percent (8%) per
annum shall be charged if the debt is not repaid within sixty (60) days after the date of disqualification. Failure

CHAPTER 34 3
to repay this debt creates a lien in favor of the Teachers' Retirement System upon all property of the person
who improperly receives benefits and does not repay those benefits; and
(11) Benefits under subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall apply to a child who is a legally adopted survivor at
the time of the death of the member. This provision shall be retroactive to include a child who was born after
January 1, 1990, and is a legally adopted survivor of a member whose death occurred prior to July 15, 2008.
Section 2. KRS 161.605 is amended to read as follows:
Any member retired by reason of service may return to work in a position covered by the Kentucky Teachers'
Retirement System and continue to receive his or her retirement allowance under the following conditions:
(1) Any member who is retired with thirty (30) or more years of service may return to work in a full-time or a
part-time position, or in a position providing substitute teaching service, covered by the Teachers' Retirement
System and earn up to a maximum of seventy-five percent (75%) of the member's last annual compensation
measured on a daily rate to be determined by the board of trustees. For purposes of determining whether the
salary of a member returning to work is seventy-five percent (75%) or less of the member's last annual
compensation, all remuneration paid and benefits provided to the member, on an actual dollar or fair market
value basis as determined by the retirement system, excluding employer-provided medical insurance required
under subsection (4) of this section, shall be considered. Members who were retired on or before June 30,
2002, shall be entitled to return to work under the provisions of this section as if they had retired with thirty
(30) years of service. Nonqualified service credit purchased under the provisions of KRS 161.5465 or
elsewhere with any state-administered retirement system shall not be used to meet the thirty (30) year
requirement set forth in this subsection. Out-of state teaching service provided in public schools for
kindergarten through grade twelve (12) may count toward the thirty (30) year requirement set forth in this
subsection even if it is not purchased as service credit, if the member obtains from his or her out-of-state
employer certification of this service on forms prescribed by the retirement system;
(2) Any member who is retired with less than thirty (30) years of service after June 30, 2002, may return to work
in a full-time or part-time position, or in a position providing substitute teaching service, covered by the
Teachers' Retirement System and earn up to a maximum of sixty-five percent (65%) of the member's last
annual compensation measured on a daily rate to be determined by the board of trustees. For purposes of
determining whether the salary of a member returning to work is sixty-five percent (65%) or less of the
member's last annual compensation, all remuneration paid and benefits provided to the member, on an actual
dollar or fair market value basis as determined by the retirement system, excluding employer-provided medical
insurance required under subsection (4) of this section, shall be considered;
(3) Under this section, an employer may employ full-time a number of retired members not to exceed ten percent
(10%) of the membership actively employed full-time by that employer. The board of trustees may reduce this
ten percent (10%) cap upon recommendation of the retirement system's actuary if a reduction is necessary to
maintain the actuarial soundness of the retirement system. The board of trustees may increase the ten percent
(10%) cap upon a determination that an increase is warranted to help address a shortage in the number of
available teachers and upon the determination of the retirement system's actuary that the proposed cap increase
allows the actuarial soundness of the retirement system to be maintained. For purposes of this subsection,
"full-time" means the same as defined by KRS 161.220(21). A local school district may exceed the quota
established by this subsection by making an annual written request to the Kentucky Department of Education
which the department may approve on a year-by-year basis;
(4) (a) Except as provided by subsection (9) of this section, a retired member returning to work in a full-time
or part-time position, or in a position providing substitute teaching service[,] under subsection (1) or (2)
of this section, shall contribute to an account with the retirement system that shall be administered
independently from and with no reciprocal impact with the member's original retirement account, or any
other account from which the member is eligible to draw a retirement allowance.
(b) Except as provided by subsection (9) of this section, a retired member returning to work under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall make contributions to the retirement system at the rate
provided under KRS 161.540. The new account shall independently meet all vesting requirements as
well as all other conditions set forth in KRS 161.600(1) or (2), as applicable, before any retirement
allowance is payable from this account. The retirement allowance accruing under this new account shall
be calculated pursuant to KRS 161.620. This new account shall not entitle the member to a duplication
of the benefits offered under KRS 161.620(7) or 161.675, nor shall this new account provide the
benefits offered by KRS 161.520, 161.525, 161.620(3), 161.655, 161.661, or 161.663.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) A retired member returning to work for an employer that participates in a state-administered
retirement system[ under subsection (1) or (2) of this section] shall waive his or her medical insurance
with the Teachers' Retirement System during the period of reemployment and shall receive the medical
insurance coverage that is offered by the member's active employer[ that is generally provided by the
member's active employer to the other members of the retirement system that the active employer
employs]. If medical insurance coverage is not available from the employer, the Kentucky Teachers'
Retirement System may provide coverage for the member.
(d) A retired member returning to work under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall not be eligible to
purchase service credit for any service provided after the member's effective date of retirement but prior
to the date that the member returns to work. A member returning to work under subsection (1) or (2) of
this section shall not be eligible to purchase service credit that the member would have otherwise been
eligible to purchase prior to the member's initial retirement.
(e) A retired member who returns to work under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, or in the event of the
death of the member, the member's estate or applicably designated beneficiary, shall be entitled, within
ninety (90) days of the posting of the annual report submitted by the employer, to a refund of
contributions as permitted and limited by KRS 161.470;
(5) The board of trustees may annually, on July 1, adjust the current daily rate of a member's last annual
compensation, for each full twelve (12) month period that has elapsed subsequent to the member earning his or
her last annual compensation, by the percentage increase in the annual average of the consumer price index for
all urban consumers for the calendar year preceding the adjustment as published by the Federal Bureau of
Labor Statistics, not to exceed five percent (5%) annually. Each annual adjustment shall become part of the
member's daily rate base. Failure to comply with the salary limitations set forth in subsections (1) and (2) of
this section as may be adjusted by this subsection shall result in a reduction of the member's retirement
allowance or any other benefit to which the member would otherwise be entitled on a dollar-for-dollar basis
for each dollar that the member exceeds these salary limitations, and the member shall be refunded his or her
retirement contributions made on the compensation that exceeds these salary limitations. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law to the contrary, a member retiring from a local school district who returns to work for a
local school district under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be entitled, without any reduction to his or
her retirement allowance or any other retirement benefit, to earn a minimum amount equal to two[one]
hundred [seventy ]dollars ($200)[($170)] per day;
(6) (a) A retired member returning to work under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall have separated from
service for a period of at least one (1) year if returning to work for the same employer on a full-time
basis, and at least three (3) months if returning to work for a different employer on a full-time basis. A
retired member returning to work under subsection (1) or (2) of this section on a part-time basis shall
have separated from service for a period of at least three (3) months before returning to work for any
employer.
(b) [As an alternative to the separation-from-service requirements in paragraph (a) of this subsection, a
retired member who is returning to work for the same employer in a full-time position under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section may elect a separation-from-service of not less than two (2)
months followed by a forfeiture of the retired member's retirement allowance on a month-to-month
basis for each month that the member has separated from service for less than twelve (12) full months.
A retired member returning to work for the same employer in a part-time position, or for a different
employer in a full-time position, may elect an alternative separation-from-service requirement of at
least two (2) months followed by a forfeiture of the member's retirement allowance for one (1) month.
During the period that the member forfeits his or her retirement allowance and thereafter, member and
employer contributions shall be made to the retirement system as a result of employment in any position
subject to membership in the retirement system. The member shall contribute to an account with the
retirement system subject to the conditions set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(c) ]A retired member who is returning to work for an employer that has employees who participate in the
Teachers' Retirement System shall comply with the separation-from-service requirements in this
subsection before performing any service for the employer, regardless of whether the retired member is
providing service in a position covered by the Teachers' Retirement System.
(c)[(d)] The starting date for any separation from service required under this subsection shall be the
effective date of the member's retirement.

CHAPTER 34 5
(d)[(e) ] The separation-from-service requirements of this subsection are not met if there is a prearranged
agreement between the member and an employer that has employees who participate in the Teachers'
Retirement System prior to retirement for the member to work for the employer after retirement.
(e)[(f)] The Teachers' Retirement System may require the member and the employer for which the
member is returning to work to certify in writing on a form prescribed by the Teachers' Retirement
System that no prearranged agreement was or will be entered into between the member and employer
prior to retirement for the member to work for the employer after retirement.
(f)[(g)] Failure to comply with the separation-from-service requirements in this subsection voids a
member's retirement and the member shall be required to return all the retirement benefits he or she
received, with interest, for the period of time that the member returned to work without a sufficient
separation from service;
(7) (a) Effective July 1, 2004, local school districts may employ retired members in full-time or part-time
teaching or administrative positions in critical shortage areas without limitation on the compensation of
the retired members that is otherwise required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The number of
retired members that a local school district may employ under this subsection shall be no more than four
(4) members per local school district or ten percent (10%) of the total active members employed by the
local school district on a full-time basis as defined under KRS 161.220(21), whichever number is
greater. Retired members returning to work under this subsection shall be subject to the separation-
from-service requirements set forth in subsection (6) of this section. Retired members returning to work
under this subsection shall waive their medical insurance coverage with the retirement system during
their period of reemployment and receive medical insurance coverage that is offered by the member's
active employer[offered to other full-time members employed by the local school district]. Retired
members returning to work under this subsection shall contribute to an account subject to the conditions
set forth in subsection (4) of this section. Retired members returning to work under this subsection shall
make contributions to the retirement system at the rate provided under KRS 161.540. The employer
shall make contributions at the rate provided under KRS 161.550. Local school districts shall make
annual payments to the retirement system on the compensation paid to the reemployed retirees at the
rates determined by the retirement system's actuary that reflect any accrued liability resulting from the
reemployment of these members.
(b) The Department of Education may employ retired members in full-time or part-time teaching or
nonteaching positions without the limitations on compensation otherwise required by subsections (1)
and (2) of this section to fill critical shortage areas in the schools it operates, including the Kentucky
School for the Blind and the Kentucky School for the Deaf, and to serve on audit teams. The
department shall be subject to the same requirements as local school districts as provided in paragraph
(a) of this subsection, except the Teachers' Retirement System shall determine the maximum number of
employees that may be employed under this paragraph;
(8) The return-to-work limitations set forth in this section shall apply to retired members who are returning to
work in the same position from which they retired, or a position substantially similar to the one from which
they retired, or a position described in KRS 161.046 or any position listed in KRS 161.220(4) which requires
membership in the retirement system. Positions which generally require certification or graduation from a four
(4) year college or university as a condition of employment which are created, or changed to remove the
position from coverage under KRS 161.220(4) are also subject to the return to work limitations set forth in this
section. The board of trustees shall determine whether employment in a nonteaching position is subject to this
subsection;
(9) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, individuals who become members on or after January 1,
2022, who subsequently retire and begin drawing a monthly lifetime retirement allowance from the
Teachers' Retirement System, who following retirement are reemployed with an employer participating
in the Teachers' Retirement System, shall not be eligible to contribute to or earn benefits in a second
retirement account in the Teachers' Retirement System during the period of reemployment.
(b) The provisions of subsections (1) to (7) of this section are not subject to KRS 161.714;
(10) Retired members may be employed in a part-time teaching capacity by an agency described in KRS
161.220(4)(b) or (n), not to exceed the equivalent of twelve (12) teaching hours in any one (1) fiscal year.
Retired members may be employed for a period not to exceed the equivalent of one hundred (100) days in any
one (1) fiscal year in a part-time administrative or nonteaching capacity by an agency described in KRS
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
161.220(4)(b) or (n) in a position that would otherwise be covered by the retirement system. Except as
otherwise provided by this subsection, the return to work provisions set forth in subsections (1) to (7) of this
section shall not apply to retired members who return to work solely for an agency described in KRS
161.220(4)(b) or (n). Calculation of the number of days and teaching hours for part-time teaching, substitute
teaching, or part-time employment in a nonteaching capacity under this section shall not exceed the ratio
between a school year and the actual months of retirement for the member during that school year. The board
of trustees by administrative regulation may establish fractional equivalents of a day of teaching service. Any
member who exceeds the twelve (12) hour or one hundred (100) day limitations of this subsection shall be
subject to having his or her retirement voided and be required to return all retirement allowances and other
benefits paid to the member or on the member's behalf since the effective date of retirement. In lieu of voiding
a member's retirement, the system may reduce the member's retirement allowance or any other benefit to
which the member would otherwise be entitled on a dollar-for-dollar basis for each dollar of compensation that
the member earns in employment exceeding twelve (12) hours, one hundred (100) days, or any apportionment
of the two (2) combined. Retired members returning to work for an employer described in KRS 161.220(4)(b)
or (n) shall comply with the separation-from-service requirements of subsection (6) of this section;
(11) When a retired member returns to employment in a part-time teaching capacity or in a nonteaching capacity as
provided in subsection (10) of this section, the employer shall contribute annually to the retirement system on
the compensation paid to the retired member at rates determined by the retirement system actuary that reflect
accrued liability for retired members who return to work under subsection (10) of this section; and
(12) For retired members who return to work during any one (1) fiscal year in both a position described in KRS
161.220(4)(b) or (n) and in a position described under another provision under KRS 161.220(4), and for retired
members who return to work in a position described under KRS 161.220(4)(b) or (n) in both a teaching and an
administrative or nonteaching capacity, the board of trustees shall adopt a methodology for a pro rata
apportionment of days and hours that the retired member may work in each position.
(13) Notwithstanding any other provision of KRS 161.220 to 161.716 to the contrary, an annuitant who has
returned to work following retirement with an employer that does not participate in the state-administered
retirement systems shall not be required to take health insurance coverage through the employer and the
system shall continue to provide health insurance coverage and benefits to the annuitant during the period of
employment, except as may be required by the Medicare Secondary Payer Act under 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395y(b).
(14) Any member retired by reason of service may waive his or her annuity and return to full-time employment
in a Teachers' Retirement System-covered position that is on the certified salary schedule under the
following conditions:
(a) The member shall:
1. Receive no annuity payments while employed in a full-time position described in this
subsection;
2. Make contributions on the salaries received for the service in a full-time position;
3. If employed for at least one (1) consecutive contract year in a full-time position, have his or
her retirement annuity recalculated as provided in the regular retirement formula in
subsection (1) of Section 4 of this Act, except that, regardless of salaries earned during waiver,
a monthly retirement allowance recalculated under this paragraph shall not be increased by
more than ten percent (10%) per full contract year of waiver worked or a prorated percentage
for a year during waiver when less than a full contract year was worked. The recalculated
retirement allowance shall be less any applicable actuarial discount applied to the original
retirement allowance due to the election of a joint and last survivor option; and
4. Waive his or her medical insurance coverage with the Teachers' Retirement System during the
period of reemployment and instead shall receive the medical insurance coverage that is
generally offered by the member's active employer;
(b) 1. The member's estate or, if there is a beneficiary applicably designated by the member, then the
beneficiary, shall continue to be eligible for life insurance benefits as provided in KRS
161.655.
2. Retirement option, plan account type, and beneficiary designation on original retirement shall
not be altered by postretirement employment under this subsection, and dependents and

CHAPTER 34 7
spouses of the members shall not become eligible for benefits under KRS 161.525 or 161.661
or Section 1 of this Act due to postretirement employment;
(c) 1. When a member returns to a full-time position described in this subsection and as provided in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, the employer is required to withhold and remit regular
retirement contributions.
2. The member shall be returned to the annuity rolls on July 1 following completion of the
contract year or on the first day of the month following the month of termination of service. A
member shall not be returned to the annuity rolls until after he or she has filed a retirement
application in compliance with KRS 161.600(6). Any discounts applied at the time of the
original retirement due to service or age may be reduced or eliminated in the recalculation
subject to the ten percent (10%) cap in paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(d) A member retired by reason of service who has been employed the equivalent of twenty-five (25) days
or more during a school year under Section 2 of this Act may waive the member's retirement annuity
and return to a position described in this subsection during that school year a maximum of one (1)
time during any five (5) year period, beginning with that school year.
Section 3. KRS 161.608 is amended to read as follows:
The provisions of KRS 61.680 are hereby recognized and shall be followed in calculating[computing] benefits of any
member of the Teachers' Retirement System who also has an account with the Kentucky Employees Retirement
System, County Employees Retirement System, or State Police Retirement System. The benefits shall be calculated
using a membership date as follows:
(1) Teachers' Retirement System shall use the other state-administered retirement systems' membership entry
date to establish eligibility for and participation in benefits if it is the earlier membership entry date between
the systems, and this date shall not be subsequently changed once entered in the member's record; and
(2) For individuals who begin participation in the Teacher's Retirement System on or after July 1, 2026,
service subsequently reinstated or established in another system for an earlier period or date shall not
change the individual's continued participation in the Teachers' Retirement System account type in which
they participated prior to the reinstatement.
Section 4. KRS 161.620 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The retirement allowance, in the form of a life annuity with refundable balance, of a member retiring for
service shall be calculated as follows:
(a) For retirements effective July 1, 1998, and thereafter, except as otherwise provided by this section, the
annual allowance for each year of service shall be two percent (2%) of the final average salary for
service performed prior to July 1, 1983, and two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the final average salary
for service performed after July 1, 1983, for all nonuniversity members. Except as otherwise provided
by this section, the annual retirement allowance for each year of service performed by members of the
Teachers' Retirement System who are university members shall be two percent (2%) of the final
average salary. Actuarial discounts due to age or service credit at retirement may be applied as provided
in this section;
(b) For individuals who become nonuniversity members of the Teachers' Retirement System on or after
July 1, 2002, and before July 1, 2008, who upon retirement have earned less than ten (10) full years of
service credit, the retirement allowance shall be two percent (2%) of the member's final average salary
for each year of service. For individuals who become nonuniversity members of the Teachers'
Retirement System on or after July 1, 2002, and before July 1, 2008, and who upon retirement have
earned at least ten (10) full years of service credit, the annual allowance for each year of service shall be
two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the member's final average salary;
(c) The board of trustees may approve for members who initially retire on or after July 1, 2004, and who
become nonuniversity members before July 1, 2008, a retirement allowance of three percent (3%) of the
member's final average salary for each year or partial year of service credit earned in excess of thirty
(30) years. This three percent (3%) factor shall be in lieu of the two and one-half percent (2.5%)
factor provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection for every year or fraction of a year of service in
excess of thirty (30) years. Upon approval of this three percent (3%) retirement factor, the board of
trustees may establish conditions of eligibility regarding the type of service credit that will qualify for
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
meeting the requirements of this subsection. This subsection is optional with the board of trustees and
shall not be subject to KRS 161.714;
(d) For individuals who become nonuniversity members of the Teachers' Retirement System on or after
July 1, 2008, but prior to January 1, 2022, the retirement allowance shall be:
1. a. One and seven-tenths percent (1.7%) of the member's final average salary for each year of
service if the member has earned ten (10) or less years of service at retirement;
b. Two percent (2%) of the member's final average salary for each year of service if the
member has earned greater than ten (10) but no more than twenty (20) years of service at
retirement;
c. Two and three-tenths percent (2.3%) of the member's final average salary for each year of
service if the member has earned greater than twenty (20) but no more than twenty-six
(26) years of service at retirement; or
d. Two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the member's final average salary for each year of
service if the member has earned greater than twenty-six (26) but no more than thirty (30)
years of service at retirement; and
2. Three percent (3%) of the member's final average salary for each year or partial year of service
earned in excess of thirty (30) years of service at retirement subject to the same terms and
conditions as set forth in paragraph (c) of this subsection;
(e) For individuals who become university members of the Teachers' Retirement System on or after July 1,
2008, but prior to January 1, 2022, the retirement allowance shall be:
1. One and one-half percent (1.5%) of the member's final average salary for each year of service if
the member has earned ten (10) or less years of service at retirement;
2. One and seven-tenths percent (1.7%) of the member's final average salary for each year of
service if the member has earned greater than ten (10) but no more than twenty (20) years of
service at retirement;
3. One and eighty-five hundredths percent (1.85%) of the member's final average salary for each
year of service if the member has earned greater than twenty (20) but less than twenty-seven (27)
years of service at retirement; or
4. Two percent (2%) of the member's final average salary for each year of service if the member
has earned twenty-seven (27) or more years of service at retirement;
(f) For individuals who become nonuniversity members of the Teachers' Retirement System on or after
January 1, 2022, the retirement allowance shall, except as adjusted by the board pursuant to KRS
161.633, be the following percentage of the member's final average salary for each year of service:
1. One and seven-tenths percent (1.7%), which shall be increased incrementally each month the
member's age at retirement is greater than sixty (60) so that the incremental increase is four one-
hundredths of one percent (0.04%) for each complete additional year of age at retirement in
excess of sixty (60), not to exceed a value of one and nine-tenths percent (1.9%) at age sixty-five
(65) or greater; plus
2. a. One-quarter of one percent (0.25%), if the member has earned at least twenty (20) but less
than thirty (30) years of service at retirement; or
b. One-half of one percent (0.50%), if the member has earned thirty (30) or more years of
service at retirement;
(g) For individuals who become university members of the Teachers' Retirement System on or after
January 1, 2022, the retirement allowance shall, except as adjusted by the board pursuant to KRS
161.634, be the following percentage of the member's final average salary for each year of service:
1. Seven-tenths of one percent (0.7%), which shall be increased incrementally each month the
member's age at retirement is greater than sixty (60) so that the incremental increase is four one-
hundredths of one percent (0.04%) for each complete additional year of age in excess of sixty
(60), not to exceed a value of nine-tenths of one percent (0.9%) at age sixty-five (65) or greater;
plus

CHAPTER 34 9
2. a. One-quarter of one percent (0.25%), if the member has earned at least twenty (20) but less
than thirty (30) years of service at retirement; or
b. One-half of one percent (0.50%), if the member has earned thirty (30) or more years of
service at retirement; and
(h) The retirement allowance of a member at retirement, as measured on a life annuity, shall not exceed the
member's last yearly salary or the member's final average salary, whichever is the greater amount. For
purposes of this section, "yearly salary" means the compensation earned by a member during the most
recent period of contributing service, either consecutive or nonconsecutive, preceding the member's
effective retirement date and shall be subject to the provisions of KRS 161.220(9) and (10). This
paragraph shall not apply to the supplemental benefit component.
(2) Effective July 1, 2002, and annually on July 1 thereafter, the retirement allowance of each retired member and
of each beneficiary of a retirement option shall be increased in the amount of one and one-half percent (1.5%),
provided the retired member had been retired for at least the full twelve (12) months immediately preceding
the date that the increase is effective. In the event that the retired member had been retired for less than the full
twelve (12) months immediately preceding the date that the increase is effective, then the increase shall be
reduced on a pro rata basis by each month that the retired member had not been retired for the full twelve (12)
months immediately preceding the effective date of the increase. This subsection shall not apply to benefits
from the supplemental benefit component, and the board may adjust this value for individuals who become
members on or after January 1, 2022, as provided by KRS 161.633 or 161.634, as applicable.
(3) Any member qualifying for retirement under a life annuity with refundable balance shall be entitled to receive
an annual allowance amounting to not less than four hundred dollars ($400) effective July 1, 2002, and not less
than four hundred forty dollars ($440) effective July 1, 2003, multiplied by the service credit years of the
member. These minimums shall apply to the retired members receiving annuity payments and to those
members retiring on or subsequent to the effective dates listed in this subsection, except the following:
(a) Individuals who become members of the Teachers' Retirement System on or after July 1, 2008; or
(b) Members whose retirement allowance payment is reduced below the minimum allowance as a result of
its division in a qualified domestic relations order or any other provision permitted under KRS 161.700.
(4) The minimum retirement allowance provided in this section shall apply in the case of members retired or
retiring under an option other than a life annuity with refundable balance in the same proportion to the benefits
of the member and his or her beneficiary or beneficiaries as provided in the duly-adopted option tables at the
time of the member's retirement.
(5) Effective July 1, 2008, the monthly allowance of each retired member and each recipient of a retirement option
of the retired member may be increased in an amount not to exceed three and one-half percent (3.5%) of the
monthly allowance in effect the previous month, provided the retired member had been retired for at least the
full twelve (12) months immediately preceding the date that the increase is effective. In the event that the
retired member had been retired for less than the full twelve (12) months immediately preceding the date that
the increase is effective, then the increase shall be reduced on a pro rata basis by each month that the retired
member had not been retired for the full twelve (12) months immediately preceding the effective date of the
increase. The level of increase provided for in this subsection shall be determined by the funding provided in
the 2008-2010 biennium budget appropriation.
(6) Effective July 1, 2009, the monthly allowance of each retired member and each recipient of a retirement option
of the retired member may be increased in an amount not to exceed seven-tenths of one percent (0.7%) of the
monthly allowance in effect the previous month, provided the retired member had been retired for at least the
full twelve (12) months immediately preceding the date that the increase is effective. In the event that the
retired member had been retired for less than the full twelve (12) months immediately preceding the date that
the increase is effective, then the increase shall be reduced on a pro rata basis by each month that the retired
member had not been retired for the full twelve (12) months immediately preceding the effective date of the
increase. The level of increase provided for in this subsection shall be determined by the funding provided in
the 2008-2010 biennium budget appropriation.
(7) Effective July 1, 1990, monthly payments of two hundred dollars ($200) shall be payable for the benefit of an
adult child of a member retired for service when the child's mental or physical condition is sufficient to cause
dependency on the member at the time of retirement. Eligibility for this payment shall continue for the life of
the child or until the time the mental or physical condition creating the dependency no longer exists or the
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
child marries. Benefits under this subsection shall apply to legally adopted survivors provided the proceedings
for the adoption were initiated at least one (1) year prior to the death of the member. The board of trustees
shall be the sole judge of eligibility or dependency and may require formal application or information relating
thereto. This payment may be applied for and managed by the parent who is the retired member without
necessity of court order or other legal authority.
(8) Members of the Teachers' Retirement System shall be subject to the annuity income limitations imposed by
Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Service Code.
(9) Compensation in excess of the limitations imposed by Section 401(a)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code shall
not be used in determining a member's retirement annuity. The limitation on compensation for eligible
members shall not be less than the amount which was allowed to be taken into account by the retirement
system in effect on July 1, 1993. For this purpose, an eligible member is an individual who was a member of
the retirement system before the first plan year beginning after December 31, 1995.
Signed by Governor April 7, 2026.